Washington statutes.
RCW 18.74.520

Physical therapy licensure compact—Criminal history information.

The board shall not disseminate any criminal history information gained through a federal background check, ordered pursuant to RCW 18.74.500, the physical therapy licensure compact, to the physical therapy compact commission or another state or state licensure board.

[ 2017 c 108 s 3.]